District of Columbia statutes.
44-105.02

Self-determination, choice, independence, participation, and privacy.

(a)

A resident shall have the right to be treated at all times as follows:

(1)

Courteously;

(2)

Respectfully;

(3)

With full recognition of personal dignity and individuality; and

(4)

With assurance of privacy and the opportunity to act autonomously and share in the responsibility for decisions.

(b)

A resident of an ALR shall have the right to live in an environment that:

(1)

Maintains and enhances the resident’s dignity, independence, and respect in full recognition of his or her individuality and physical and mental capabilities;

(2)

Is creatively designed to counter loneliness, depression, dependence, boredom, and designed to manage difficult behavior;

(3)

Provides opportunities for socialization, social interaction, leisure activities, and spiritual and religious activities consistent with the preferences and background of the resident; and

(4)

Facilitates participation by arranging for transportation and assisting with communication and social skills and other services.

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 502, 47 DCR 2647